New York, session 2025-2026, S6300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 2 section 214-k to read as follows: 3 § 214-k. Expiration of right to collect consumer credit debt. When 4 the time for an action arising out of a consumer credit transaction 5 where a purchaser, borrower or debtor is a defendant has expired the 6 right to collect consumer credit debt is extinguished as well as the 7 remedy. For purposes of this section, "the right to collect consumer 8 credit debt" shall mean any attempts by the creditor, third party 9 purchaser, or other authorized third party to collect such debt includ- 10 ing, but not limited to, calls, mail or other attempts to collect. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10389-01-5